Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 27 Veterans’ Organizations

30-27-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1074, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-27-1

; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 6, effective July 5, 2019.

30-27-2.
Recognition of Italian American organization.

The Italian American war veterans of the United States, incorporated, as federally chartered, whose membership and officers consist solely of honorably discharged American war veterans who served in the United States army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, or air force, is hereby declared to be an officially recognized veterans’ organization in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2718, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-27-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 367, § 1.

30-27-3.
Emblems and insignia of Italian American organization.

Any person who willfully wears, sells, or manufactures or attaches to any motor vehicle, the insignia, emblem, or design of the Italian American war veterans of the United States, incorporated; or uses the insignia, emblem, or design, or the name of the organization by falsely representing himself or herself to be a member, officer, or director thereof in good standing, to obtain, or attempt to obtain, aid or assistance within the state; or willfully uses the name of the organization, or the titles of its officers or directors, or uses its insignia, emblems, or designs, or the forms or patterns thereof, or its ritual or ceremonies; unless entitled to use, wear, sell, manufacture, or attach those emblems and insignia under the constitution, bylaws, rules, or regulations of the organization, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person found guilty of violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2803, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-27-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 17, § 1.

30-27-4.
Flower of Italian American organization.

The daisy, in labeled, artificial form, is hereby declared to be the official flower of the Italian American War Veterans of the United States, Incorporated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2702, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-27-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 17, § 1.

30-27-5.
Sale of artificial daisies.

The sale, or offering for sale, of any daisy, in labeled, artificial form, shall be restricted solely to the Italian American war veterans of the United States, incorporated, and its auxiliaries, and the funds derived from any sale shall be devoted exclusively towards the benefit of American war veterans and their families, residing in the state of Rhode Island or otherwise hospitalized therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2702, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-27-5

; P.L. 1960, ch. 17, § 1.